Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3102
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the County Purchasing Act is to provide a uniform purchasing procedure for county purchases of equipment, supplies, other items of personal property, and services and to provide for county sales of surplus personal property which is obsolete or not usable by the county.

Laws 1985, LB 393, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 828, § 4.